New Jersey, session 221, A4263.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-7) is amended to read as follows: 7.  a.  (1) The commission shall accept applications from entities for permits to operate as medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries.  For the purposes of this section, the term "permit" shall be deemed to include a conditional permit issued pursuant to subsection d. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) and any permit issued to a microbusiness pursuant to subsection e. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1). (2) (a) For a period of 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.): (i)    no applicant may concurrently hold more than one permit issued by the commission pursuant to this section, regardless of type; and (ii)   there shall be no more than 28 active medical cannabis cultivator permits, including medical cannabis cultivator permits deemed to be held by alternative treatment centers issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) and medical cannabis cultivator permits deemed to be held by alternative treatment centers issued a permit subsequent to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.); provided that medical cannabis cultivator permits issued to microbusinesses pursuant to subsection e. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) shall not count toward this limit. (b)   Commencing 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), a permit holder shall be authorized to concurrently hold a medical cannabis cultivator permit, a medical cannabis manufacturer permit, and a medical cannabis dispensary permit, provided that no permit holder shall be authorized to concurrently hold more than one permit of each type.  The permit holder may submit an application for a permit of any type that the permit holder does not currently hold prior to the expiration of the 18-month period described in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, provided that no additional permit shall be awarded to the permit holder during the 18-month period. (c) (i) The provisions of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall not apply to any alternative treatment center that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), to any alternative treatment center that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), to one of the four alternative treatment centers issued a permit pursuant to an application submitted after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to a request for applications published in the New Jersey Register prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) that are expressly exempt from the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, or to one of the three alternative treatment centers issued a permit pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) that are expressly exempt from the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, which alternative treatment centers shall be deemed to concurrently hold a medical cannabis cultivator permit, a medical cannabis manufacturer permit, and a medical cannabis dispensary permit, and shall be authorized to engage in any conduct authorized pursuant to those permits in relation to the cultivation, manufacturing, and dispensing of medical cannabis. (ii)   In addition, each of the alternative treatment centers described in subsubparagraph (i) of this subparagraph, to which the provisions of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall not apply, shall, upon the adoption of the initial rules and regulations by the commission pursuant to subparagraph (a) of paragraph (1) of subsection d. of section 6 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-34), be deemed to either concurrently hold a Class 1 Cannabis Cultivator license, a Class 2 Cannabis Manufacturer License, a Class 5 Cannabis Retailer license, plus an additional Class 5 Cannabis Retailer license for each satellite dispensary authorized and established by the alternative treatment center pursuant to subparagraph (d) of this paragraph, and a Class 6 Cannabis Delivery license, or hold a Class 3 Cannabis Wholesaler license, and may also be deemed to hold a Class 4 Cannabis Distributor license.  Any alternative treatment center deemed to hold one or more licenses as described in this subsubparagraph may begin to operate as any authorized class of cannabis establishment, or establishment and delivery service, or as a cannabis wholesaler and distributor, upon receipt of written approval from the municipality in which the proposed establishment or delivery service, or distributor is to be located and obtaining an initial license or licenses, as applicable, issued by the commission pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection a. of section 33 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-46). (d) (i)  No entity may be issued or concurrently hold more than one medical cannabis cultivator permit, one medical cannabis manufacturer permit, or one medical cannabis dispensary permit at one time, and no medical cannabis dispensary shall be authorized to establish a satellite location on or after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), except that an alternative treatment center that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) or that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) shall be authorized to maintain up to two satellite dispensaries, including any satellite dispensary that was approved pursuant to an application submitted prior to or within 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.).  The three alternative treatment centers issued permits pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) that are expressly exempt from the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall be authorized to establish and maintain up to one satellite dispensary location, provided that the satellite dispensary was approved pursuant to an application submitted within 18 months after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.). (ii)   Notwithstanding the provisions of subsubparagraph (i) of this subparagraph, an investor, investor group, or fund that provides significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, to an applicant for a medical cannabis dispensary permit, which applicant has been certified as a minority business pursuant to P.L.1986, c.195 (C.52:27H-21.18 et seq.), a women's business pursuant to P.L.1986, c.195 (C.52:27H-21.18 et seq.), or is a disabled-veterans' business, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2015, c.116 (C.52:32-31.2), may own up to a 35 percent interest in up to seven entities that have been issued a medical cannabis dispensary permit, provided that each such medical cannabis dispensary is a certified minority or women's business or a disabled-veterans' business, and the terms of the agreement to provide significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, whether provided in the form of equity, a loan, or otherwise, including interest rates, returns, and fees, are commercially reasonable based on the terms generally provided to comparable businesses.  The terms of the agreement for the provision of significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, may include performance, quality, and other requirements as a condition of providing the financial or technical assistance or use of intellectual property.  An applicant for a medical cannabis dispensary permit that has or will receive significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property under this subsubparagraph shall include with the permit application materials submitted to the commission a copy of the agreement to provide significant financial or technical assistance or significant use of intellectual property, or a combination thereof, which agreement shall be subject to review by the commission as provided in subsection f. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1). An applicant for a medical cannabis dispensary permit that receives significant financial or technical assistance or the significant use of intellectual property under this subsubparagraph shall pay back to the investor, investor group, or fund the full value of the financial or technical assistance or intellectual property provided under the agreement, plus any applicable interest and fees, in a period not less than five years after the date of the agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is less than $100,000, in a period not less than seven years after the date of the agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is between $100,001 and $250,000, in a period not less than 10 years after the date of agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is between $250,001 and $500,000, and, subject to any terms and conditions imposed by a lender, in a period not less than 10 years after the date of the agreement if the full value of the assistance or property is greater than $500,000.  An investor, investor group, or fund that has acquired an ownership interest in one or more entities that have been issued a medical cannabis dispensary permit as authorized under this subsubparagraph may maintain the ownership interest after the date the full value of the financial or technical assistance or use of intellectual property provided under the agreement, plus interest and fees, has been repaid by the applicant that received the assistance or use of intellectual property. In no case may the controlling interest in the entity that holds a medical cannabis dispensary permit in which an investor, investor group, or fund owns an interest as authorized under this subsubparagraph revert to the investor, investor group, or fund in the event of a default or failure by the certified minority or women's business or disabled-veterans' business, as applicable, and any such controlling interest may only be transferred to a certified minority or women's business or a disabled-veterans' business. An entity issued a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary permit, or an individual associated with the ownership or management of such entity, may invest in or participate in an investor group or a fund that meets the requirements of this subsubparagraph with respect to a Class 5 cannabis retailer license or an alternative treatment center permit. (e)   No entity issued a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary permit may concurrently hold a clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.3), and no entity issued a clinical registrant permit pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.3) may concurrently hold a medical cannabis cultivator permit, a medical cannabis manufacturer permit, or a medical cannabis dispensary permit. (f)   Any medical cannabis dispensary permit holder may be approved by the commission to operate a cannabis consumption area, provided that the permit holder otherwise meets the requirements of section 28 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-21). (g)   An alternative treatment center that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted pursuant to a request for applications published in the New Jersey Register prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), or that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), shall be required to submit an attestation signed by a bona fide labor organization stating that the alternative treatment center has entered into a labor peace agreement with such bona fide labor organization no later than 100 days after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) or no later than 100 days after the date the alternative treatment center first opens, whichever date is later.  The maintenance of a labor peace agreement with a bona fide labor organization shall be an ongoing material condition of maintaining the alternative treatment center's permit.  The failure to submit an attestation as required pursuant to this subparagraph within 100 days after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) or within 100 days after the alternative treatment center first opens, as applicable, shall result in the suspension or revocation of the alternative treatment center's permit, provided that the commission may grant an extension to this deadline to the alternative treatment center based upon extenuating circumstances or for good cause shown. As used in this subparagraph, "bona fide labor organization" means a labor organization of any kind or employee representation committee, group, or association, in which employees participate and which exists and is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or otherwise dealing with medical or personal use cannabis employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, terms or conditions of employment, including wages and rates of pay, or other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment, and may be characterized by: it being a party to one or more executed collective bargaining agreements with medical or personal use cannabis employers, in this State or another state; it having a written constitution or bylaws in the three immediately preceding years; it filing the annual financial report required of labor organizations pursuant to subsection (b) of 29 U.S.C. s.431, or it having at least one audited financial report in the three immediately preceding years; it being affiliated with any regional or national association of unions, including but not limited to state and federal labor councils; or it being a member of a national labor organization that has at least 500 general members in a majority of the 50 states of the United States. (h) An alternative treatment center that was issued a permit prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted pursuant to a request for applications published in the New Jersey Register prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), or that was issued a permit after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) pursuant to an application submitted prior to the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.), shall be permitted to cultivate from up to two physical locations, provided that the alternative treatment center's combined mature cannabis plant grow canopy between both locations shall not exceed 150,000 square feet of bloom space or the square footage of canopy permitted under the largest tier in the tiered system adopted by the commission pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 21 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-38). (3)   The commission shall seek to ensure the availability of a sufficient number of medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries throughout the State, pursuant to need, including at least two each in the northern, central, and southern regions of the State. Medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries issued permits pursuant to this section may be nonprofit or for-profit entities. (4)   The commission shall periodically evaluate whether the number of medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, and medical cannabis dispensary permits issued are sufficient to meet the needs of qualifying patients in the State, and shall accept new applications and issue such additional permits as shall be necessary to meet those needs.  The types of permits requested and issued, and the locations of any additional permits that are authorized, shall be in the discretion of the commission based on the needs of qualifying patients in the State. (5)   (a) A medical cannabis cultivator shall be authorized to: acquire a reasonable initial and ongoing inventory, as determined by the commission, of cannabis seeds or seedlings and paraphernalia; possess, cultivate, plant, grow, harvest, and package medical cannabis, including prerolled forms, for any authorized purpose, including, but not limited to, research purposes; and deliver, transfer, transport, distribute, supply, or sell medical cannabis and related supplies to any medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State.  In no case shall a medical cannabis cultivator operate or be located on land that is valued, assessed or taxed as an agricultural or horticultural use pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.). (b)   A medical cannabis manufacturer shall be authorized to: purchase or acquire medical cannabis from any medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or clinical registrant in the State; possess and utilize medical cannabis in the manufacture and creation of medical cannabis products; and deliver, transfer, transport, supply, or sell medical cannabis products and related supplies to any medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State. (c)   A medical cannabis dispensary shall be authorized to: purchase or acquire medical cannabis from any medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State and medical cannabis products and related supplies from any medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in the State; purchase or acquire paraphernalia from any legal source; and distribute, supply, sell, or dispense medical cannabis, medical cannabis products, paraphernalia, and related supplies to qualifying patients or their designated or institutional caregivers who are registered with the commission pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-4).  A medical cannabis dispensary may furnish medical cannabis, medical cannabis products, paraphernalia, and related supplies to a medical cannabis handler for delivery to a registered qualifying patient, designated caregiver, or institutional caregiver consistent with the requirements of subsection i. of section 27 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-20). (6)   A medical cannabis cultivator shall not be limited in the number of strains of medical cannabis cultivated, and a medical cannabis manufacturer shall not be limited in the number or type of medical cannabis products manufactured or created.  A medical cannabis manufacturer may package, and a medical cannabis dispensary may directly dispense medical cannabis and medical cannabis products to qualifying patients and their designated and institutional caregivers in any authorized form.  Authorized forms shall include dried form, oral lozenges, topical formulations, transdermal form, sublingual form, tincture form, or edible form, or any other form as authorized by the commission.  Edible form shall include pills, tablets, capsules, drops or syrups, oils, chewable forms, and any other form as authorized by the commission, except that the edible forms made available to minor patients shall be limited to forms that are medically appropriate for children, including pills, tablets, capsules, chewable forms, and drops, oils, syrups, and other liquids. (7)   Nonprofit medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, and medical cannabis dispensaries need not be recognized as a 501(c)(3) organization by the federal Internal Revenue Service. b.    The commission shall require that an applicant provide such information as the commission determines to be necessary pursuant to regulations adopted pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.). c.     A person who has been convicted of a crime of the first, second, or third degree under New Jersey law or of a crime involving any controlled dangerous substance or controlled substance analog as set forth in chapter 35 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes except paragraph (11) or (12) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or paragraph (3) or (4) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or any similar law of the United States or any other state shall not be issued a permit to operate as a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant or be a director, officer, or employee of a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant, unless such conviction occurred after the effective date of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and was for a violation of federal law relating to possession or sale of cannabis for conduct that is authorized under P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or P.L.2015, c.158 (C.18A:40-12.22 et al.). d.  (1) The commission shall require each applicant seeking a permit to operate as, to be a director, officer, or employee of, or to be a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant to undergo a criminal history record background check. Any individual seeking to become a director, officer, or employee of a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant, after issuance of an initial permit shall notify the commission and shall complete a criminal history record background check and provide all information as may be required by the commission as a condition of assuming a position as director, officer, or employee of the permitted entity.  An individual who secures an investment interest or gains the authority to make controlling decisions in a permitted entity that makes the individual a significantly involved person shall notify the commission, complete a criminal history record background check, and provide all information as may be required by the commission no later than 30 days after the date the individual becomes a significantly involved person, or any permit issued to the individual or group of which the significantly involved person is a member shall be revoked and the individual or group shall be deemed ineligible to hold any ownership or investment interest in a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant for a period of at least two years, commencing from the date of revocation, and for such additional period of time as the commission deems appropriate, based on the duration of the nondisclosure, the size of the individual's or group's investment interest in the permitted entity, the amount of profits, revenue, or income realized by the individual or group from the permitted entity during the period of nondisclosure, and whether the individual had a disqualifying conviction or would otherwise have been deemed ineligible to be a significantly involved person in a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant. For purposes of this section, the term "applicant" shall include any owner, director, officer, or employee of, and any significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant.  The commission is authorized to exchange fingerprint data with and receive criminal history record background information from the Division of State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation consistent with the provisions of applicable State and federal laws, rules, and regulations.  The Division of State Police shall forward criminal history record background information to the commission in a timely manner when requested pursuant to the provisions of this section. An applicant who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to this section shall submit to being fingerprinted in accordance with applicable State and federal laws, rules, and regulations.  No check of criminal history record background information shall be performed pursuant to this section unless the applicant has furnished the applicant's written consent to that check.  An applicant who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to this section who refuses to consent to, or cooperate in, the securing of a check of criminal history record background information shall not be considered for a permit to operate, or authorization to be employed at or to be a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant.  An applicant shall bear the cost for the criminal history record background check, including all costs of administering and processing the check. (2)   The commission shall not approve an applicant for a permit to operate, or authorization to be employed at or to be a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant if the criminal history record background information of the applicant reveals a disqualifying conviction as set forth in subsection c. of this section. (3)   Upon receipt of the criminal history record background information from the Division of State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the commission shall provide written notification to the applicant of the applicant's qualification or disqualification for a permit to operate or be a director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant. If the applicant is disqualified because of a disqualifying conviction pursuant to the provisions of this section, the conviction that constitutes the basis for the disqualification shall be identified in the written notice. (4)   The Division of State Police shall promptly notify the commission in the event that an individual who was the subject of a criminal history record background check conducted pursuant to this section is convicted of a crime or offense in this State after the date the background check was performed.  Upon receipt of that notification, the commission shall make a determination regarding the continued eligibility to operate or be a director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant. (5)   Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of this section to the contrary, the commission may offer provisional authority for an applicant to be an owner, director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant for a period not to exceed three months if the applicant submits to the commission a sworn statement attesting that the person has not been convicted of any disqualifying conviction pursuant to this section. (6)   Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of this section to the contrary, no applicant to be an owner, director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant shall be disqualified on the basis of any conviction disclosed by a criminal history record background check conducted pursuant to this section if the individual has affirmatively demonstrated to the commission clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation.  In determining whether clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation has been demonstrated, the following factors shall be considered: (a)   the nature and responsibility of the position which the convicted individual would hold, has held, or currently holds; (b)   the nature and seriousness of the crime or offense; (c)   the circumstances under which the crime or offense occurred; (d)   the date of the crime or offense; (e)   the age of the individual when the crime or offense was committed; (f)   whether the crime or offense was an isolated or repeated incident; (g)   any social conditions which may have contributed to the commission of the crime or offense; and (h)   any evidence of rehabilitation, including good conduct in prison or in the community, counseling or psychiatric treatment received, acquisition of additional academic or vocational schooling, successful participation in correctional work-release programs, or the recommendation of those who have had the individual under their supervision. e.     The commission shall issue a permit to operate or be an owner, director, officer, or employee of, or a significantly involved person in, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary if the commission finds that issuing such a permit would be consistent with the purposes of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and the requirements of this section and section 11 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.1) are met.  The denial of an application shall be considered a final agency decision, subject to review by the Appellate Division of the Superior Court.  A permit to operate a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, or medical cannabis dispensary issued on or after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.) shall be valid for one year and shall be renewable annually. f.     A person who has been issued a permit pursuant to this section or a clinical registrant permit pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-7.3) shall display the permit at the front entrance to the premises of the permitted facility at all times when the facility is engaged in conduct authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) involving medical cannabis, including, but not limited to, the cultivating, manufacturing, or dispensing of medical cannabis. g.    A medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant shall report any change in information to the commission not later than 10 days after such change, or the permit shall be deemed null and void. h.    Each medical cannabis dispensary and clinical registrant shall maintain and make available on its Internet website, if any, a standard price list that shall apply to all medical cannabis, medical cannabis products, and related supplies and paraphernalia sold or dispensed by the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant, which prices shall be reasonable and consistent with the actual costs incurred by the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant in connection with acquiring and selling, transferring, or dispensing the medical cannabis or medical cannabis product and related supplies and paraphernalia.  The prices charged by the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant shall not deviate from the prices indicated on the entity's current price list, provided that a price list maintained by a medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant may allow for medical cannabis to be made available at a reduced price or without charge to qualifying patients who have a demonstrated financial hardship, as that term shall be defined by the commission by regulation.  A price list required pursuant to this subsection may be revised no more than once per month, and each medical cannabis dispensary and clinical registrant shall be responsible for ensuring that the commission has a copy of the facility's current price list.  A medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant shall be liable to a civil penalty of $1,000 for each sale that occurs at a price that deviates from the entity's current price list, and to a civil penalty of $10,000 for each week during which the entity's current price list is not on file with the commission.  Any civil penalties collected by the commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the "Cannabis Regulatory, Enforcement Assistance, and Marketplace Modernization Fund" established under section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-50), and used by the commission for the purposes of administering the State medical cannabis program. i.     The commission shall adopt regulations to: (1)   require such written documentation of each delivery or dispensation of cannabis to, and pickup of cannabis for, a registered qualifying patient, including the date and amount dispensed, and, in the case of delivery, the date and times the delivery commenced and was completed, the address where the medical cannabis was delivered, the name of the patient or caregiver to whom the medical cannabis was delivered, and the name, handler certification number, and delivery certification number of the medical cannabis handler who performed the delivery, to be maintained in the records of the medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant, as the commission determines necessary to ensure effective documentation of the operations of each medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant; (2)   monitor, oversee, and investigate all activities performed by medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, medical cannabis dispensaries, and clinical registrants; (3)   ensure adequate security of all facilities 24 hours per day and security of all delivery methods to registered qualifying patients; [and] (4)   establish thresholds for administrative action to be taken against a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant and its employees, officers, investors, directors, or governing board pursuant to subsection m. of this section, including, but not limited to, specific penalties or disciplinary actions that may be imposed in a summary proceeding; (5)   monitor the prices of all medical cannabis, medical cannabis products, and related supplies and paraphernalia sold or dispensed by medical cannabis cultivators, medical cannabis manufacturers, medical cannabis dispensaries, and clinical registrants; and (6)   establish a process by which the commission shall implement a six-month price cap on any medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant, provided that the commission determines that the prices of such a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant are unreasonable and inconsistent with the actual costs incurred by the medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant in connection with cultivating, acquiring and selling, transferring, or dispensing the medical cannabis or medical cannabis product and related supplies and paraphernalia.  Under the process established pursuant to this paragraph, the commission shall be permitted to amend the price cap over the six-month period and to implement as many price caps on a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant as determined necessary, with no price cap to exceed a six-month period. j.     (1) Each medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, and clinical registrant shall require the owners, directors, officers, and employees at the permitted facility to complete at least eight hours of ongoing training each calendar year.  The training shall be tailored to the roles and responsibilities of the individual's job function, and shall include training on confidentiality and such other topics as shall be required by the commission. (2)   Each medical cannabis dispensary and clinical registrant shall consider whether to make interpreter services available to the population served, including for individuals with a visual or hearing impairment.  The commission shall provide assistance to any medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant that seeks to provide such services in locating appropriate interpreter resources.  A medical cannabis dispensary or clinical registrant shall assume the cost of providing interpreter services pursuant to this subsection. k.  (1) The first six alternative treatment centers issued permits following the effective date of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) shall be authorized to sell or transfer such permit and other assets to a for-profit entity, provided that:  the sale or transfer is approved by the commission; each owner, director, officer, and employee of, and significantly involved person in, the entity seeking to purchase or receive the transfer of the permit, undergoes a criminal history record background check pursuant to subsection d. of this section, provided that nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require any individual to undergo a criminal history record background check if the individual would otherwise be exempt from undergoing a criminal history record background check pursuant to subsection d. of this section; the commission finds that the sale or transfer of the permit would be consistent with the purposes of P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.); and no such sale or transfer shall be authorized more than one year after the effective date of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-5.1 et al.).  The sale or transfer of a permit pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the requirements of the "New Jersey Nonprofit Corporation Act," N.J.S.15A:1-1 et seq., provided that, prior to or at the time of the sale or transfer, all debts and obligations of the nonprofit entity are either paid in full or assumed by the for-profit entity purchasing or acquiring the permit, or a reserve fund is established for the purpose of paying in full the debts and obligations of the nonprofit entity, and the for-profit entity pays the full value of all assets held by the nonprofit entity, as reflected on the nonprofit entity's balance sheet, in addition to the agreed-upon price for the sale or transfer of the entity's alternative treatment center permit.  Until such time as the members of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission are appointed and the commission first organizes, the Department of Health shall have full authority to approve a sale or transfer pursuant to this paragraph. (2)   The sale or transfer of any interest of five percent or more in a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit shall be subject to approval by the commission and conditioned on the entity that is purchasing or receiving transfer of the interest in the medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit completing a criminal history record background check pursuant to the requirements of subsection d. of this section. l.     No employee of any department, division, agency, board, or other State, county, or local government entity involved in the process of reviewing, processing, or making determinations with regard to medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit applications shall have any direct or indirect financial interest in the cultivating, manufacturing, or dispensing of medical cannabis or related paraphernalia, or otherwise receive anything of value from an applicant for a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit in exchange for reviewing, processing, or making any recommendations with respect to a permit application. m.   In the event that a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant fails to comply with any requirements set forth in P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any related law or regulation, the commission may invoke penalties or take administrative action against the medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant and its employees, officers, investors, directors, or governing board, including, but not limited to, assessing fines, referring matters to another State agency, and suspending or terminating any permit held by the medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant.  Any penalties imposed or administrative actions taken by the commission pursuant to this subsection may be imposed in a summary proceeding. (cf: P.L.2023, c.162, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.